Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 22 Wyoming Money Transmitters Act
§ 40-22-116.
Maintenance of records.

Each licensee shall make, keep and preserve the following books, accounts and other records for a period of five (5) years and these records shall be open to inspection by the commissioner:

A record of each payment instrument;

A general ledger, posted at least monthly, containing all assets, liability, capital, income and expense accounts;

Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;

Outstanding payment instruments;

Records of each payment instrument paid;

A list of the names and addresses of all authorized delegates and subdelegates; and

Any other records the commissioner reasonably requires by rule.

The records required under this section may be maintained in photographic, electronic or other similar form.

Records may be maintained at a location other than within this state so long as they are made accessible to the commissioner upon seven (7) business days written notice.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a)(i) deleted “and stored value sold”; in (a)(iv) and (a)(v) deleted “and stored value”; and in (a)(vi) added “and subdelegates”.

§ 40-22-117.
Confidentiality of records; exception.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, all information or reports obtained by the commissioner from an applicant, licensee or authorized delegate or subdelegate are confidential.

The commissioner may disclose confidential information to officials and examiners in other states or to federal regulatory authorities or to appropriate prosecuting attorneys.

This section does not prohibit the commissioner from disclosing to the public a list of persons licensed under this act or the aggregated financial data on those licensees.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “or subdelegate” in (a).

§ 40-22-118.
Authorized delegate contracts.

A licensee shall designate an authorized delegate by express written contract including the following:

That the licensee appoints the person as its delegate with authority to engage in money transmission on behalf of the licensee;

That an authorized delegate may not authorize subdelegates without the written consent of the commissioner; and

That authorized delegates are subject to supervision and regulation by the commissioner.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “neither a licensee nor” near the beginning, and added “not” following “delegate may” in (a)(ii).

§ 40-22-119.
Authorized delegate and subdelegate conduct.

An authorized delegate or subdelegate shall not make any fraudulent or false statement or misrepresentation to a licensee or to the commissioner.

All money transmission activities conducted by an authorized delegate or subdelegate shall be in strict accord with the licensee’s written procedures provided to the authorized delegate and subdelegate.

An authorized delegate shall remit all money owing to the licensee in accordance with the terms of the contract between the licensee and the authorized delegate.

An authorized delegate and subdelegate are deemed to consent to the commissioner’s inspection with or without prior notice to the licensee, authorized delegate or subdelegate pursuant to W.S.

40-22-115

.

A subdelegate shall remit all money owing to the authorized delegate or licensee in accordance with the terms of the contract between the authorized delegate and the subdelegate.

An authorized delegate shall not enter into contracts with subdelegates without the consent of the licensee and the commissioner.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a) added “or subdelegate”; in (b) added “or subdelegate” and “and subdelegate”; in (d) substituted “and subdelegate are” for “is”, substituted the comma for “or” following “licensee”, added “or subdelegate”; and added (e) and (f).

§ 40-22-120.
License suspension or revocation.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke a licensee’s license if the commissioner finds that:

Any fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time when the licensee applied for its license, would have been grounds for denying the application;

The licensee’s net worth becomes inadequate and the licensee after ten (10) business days written notice from the commissioner, fails to remedy the deficiency;

The licensee knowingly violates any material provision of this act or any rule or order validly promulgated by the commissioner;

The licensee is conducting its business in an unsafe or unsound manner;

The licensee is insolvent;

The licensee has suspended payment of its obligations, has made an assignment for the benefit of its creditors or has admitted in writing its inability to pay its debts as they become due;

The licensee has applied for an adjudication of bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement or other relief under any bankruptcy;

The licensee refuses to permit the commissioner to make any examination authorized by this act [§§

40-22-101

through

40-22-129

];

The licensee willfully fails to make any report required by this act;

The competence, experience, character or general fitness of the licensee indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the licensee to continue to conduct business.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-22-121.
Suspension or revocation of authorized delegates.

The commissioner may issue an order to the licensee suspending or revoking the designation of an authorized delegate or subdelegate if the commissioner finds that:

The authorized delegate or subdelegate violated this act or a rule adopted or an order issued under this act;

The authorized delegate or subdelegate has not cooperated with an examination or investigation by the commissioner;

The authorized delegate or subdelegate has engaged in fraud, intentional misrepresentation or gross negligence;

The authorized delegate or subdelegate has been convicted of a violation of a state or federal money laundering statute;

The competence, experience, character or general fitness of the authorized delegate or subdelegate or a person in control of the authorized delegate or subdelegate indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the authorized delegate or subdelegate to provide money transmission services; or

The authorized delegate or subdelegate has engaged in an unsafe or unsound practice.

In determining whether an authorized delegate or subdelegate has engaged in an unsafe or unsound practice the commissioner may consider the size and condition of the authorized delegate’s or subdelegate’s provision of money services, the magnitude of the loss, the gravity of the violation of this act and the previous conduct of the authorized delegate or subdelegate.

An authorized delegate or subdelegate may apply for relief from a suspension or revocation designation as an authorized delegate or subdelegate according to procedures prescribed by the commissioner.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “or subdelegate” throughout; and added “transmission” in (a)(v).

§ 40-22-122.
Orders to cease and desist.

If the commissioner determines that a violation of this act or of a rule adopted or an order issued under this act by a licensee, authorized delegate or subdelegate is likely to cause immediate and irreparable harm to the licensee, its customers or the public as a result of the violation or cause insolvency or significant dissipation of assets of the licensee, the commissioner may issue an order requiring the licensee, authorized delegate or subdelegate to cease and desist from the violation. The order becomes effective upon service upon the licensee, authorized delegate or subdelegate.

The commissioner may issue an order against a licensee to cease and desist from providing money transmission services through an authorized delegate or subdelegate that is the subject of a separate order pursuant to W.S.

40-22-121

by the commissioner.

An order to cease and desist remains effective and enforceable pending the completion of an administrative proceeding pursuant to Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “or subdelegate” throughout (a) and (b); and substituted the comma for “or” following “licensee” throughout (a).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 40-22-123.
Consent orders.

The commissioner may enter into a consent order at any time with a person to resolve a matter arising under this act [§§

40-22-101

through

40-22-129

]. A consent order shall be signed by the person to whom it is issued or by the person’s authorized representative and shall indicate agreement with the terms contained in the order. A consent order may provide that it does not constitute an admission by a person that this act or a rule adopted or an order issued under this act has been violated.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1.

§ 40-22-124.
Civil penalties.

The commissioner may impose a civil penalty upon a person who violates this act [§§

40-22-101

through

40-22-129

] or a rule adopted or an order issued under this act in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) per day for each day the violation is outstanding, plus the state’s costs and expenses for the investigation and prosecution of the matter, including reasonable attorney’s fees.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1.

§ 40-22-125.
Criminal penalties.

A person who intentionally makes a false statement, misrepresentation or false certification in a record filed or required to be maintained under this act [§§

40-22-101

through

40-22-129

] or who intentionally makes a false entry or omits a material entry in the record is guilty of a felony, punishable for not less than three (3) years imprisonment or a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

An individual who knowingly engages in any activity for which a license is required under this act [§§

40-22-101

through

40-22-129

] without being licensed under this act is guilty of a felony punishable for not less than three (3) years imprisonment or a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1.

§ 40-22-126.
Unlicensed persons; verification authority regarding exemptions.

If the commissioner has reason to believe that a person has violated or is violating W.S.

40-22-103

of this act the commissioner may issue an order to show cause why an order to cease and desist should not issue requiring that the person cease and desist from the violation of W.S.

40-22-103

.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 170, § 4.

In an emergency, the commissioner may petition the district court for the issuance of a temporary restraining order.

An order to cease and desist becomes effective upon service upon the person.

An order to cease and desist remains effective and enforceable pending the completion of an administrative proceeding pursuant to W.S.

40-22-127

and

40-22-128

.

A person served with an order to cease and desist for violating W.S.

40-22-103

may petition the district court for a judicial order setting aside, limiting, or suspending the enforcement, operation, or effectiveness of the order pending the completion of an administrative proceeding pursuant to W.S.

40-22-127

and

40-22-128

.

The commissioner shall commence a contested case proceeding within twenty (20) days after issuing an order to cease and desist.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2018 ch. 44, § 2, effective March 10, 2018; 2019 ch. 170, § 4, effective February 28, 2019.

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 170 § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2019.

The 2018 amendment,

added (b); and redesignated former (b) through (f) as (c) through (g).

Laws 2018, ch. 44, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2018.

The 2019 amendment,

repealed (b), which read: "If the commissioner has reason to believe a person is engaged in or is about to engage in any activity which would be subject to this act but for an exemption asserted pursuant to W.S. 40-22-104(a)(vi), and the commissioner has reason to believe the requirements of W.S. 40-22-104(a)(vi) have not been met, the commissioner may issue an order to show cause why an order to cease and desist the activity should not issue."

§ 40-22-127.
Administrative procedures.

All administrative proceedings under this act [§§

40-22-101

through

40-22-129

] shall be conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 40-22-128.
Hearings.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S. 40-22-111(c) and 40-22-122(c), the commissioner may not suspend or revoke a license, issue an order to cease and desist, suspend or revoke the designation of an authorized delegate or subdelegate, or assess a civil penalty without notice and an opportunity to be heard. The commissioner shall also hold a hearing when requested to do so by an applicant whose application for a license is denied.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “or subdelegate” in the first sentence.

§ 40-22-129.
Rulemaking and deposit of fees.

The commissioner shall promulgate all necessary rules to implement and administer this act [§§

40-22-101

through

40-22-129

].

All application, renewal, examination and licensing fees, except the amount paid for data processing by the registry or any other entity designated by the registry, shall be deposited by the commissioner with the state treasurer into the financial institutions administration account.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2013 ch. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end of (b).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “, examination” following “renewal”, and added “, except the amount paid for data processing by the registry or any other entity designated by the registry,” following “licensing fees” in (b).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2013, ch. 27, § 3, states: “This act shall apply to new licenses issued by the division of banking under the Uniform Consumer Credit Code and the Money Transmitter Act on or after July 1, 2013. The provisions of law existing prior to amendment by this act shall apply to renewal of licenses issued by the division of banking under the Uniform Consumer Credit Code and the Money Transmitter Act prior to July 1, 2013.”